Maine, session 132, LD1288.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1101, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. "Fold" means a folded piece of tin or aluminum foil or other material used to
contain a drug, usually in powder form.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1101, sub-§17, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §1, is further
amended to read:
17. "Traffick" means:
A. To make, create, or manufacture;
B. To grow or cultivate, except for marijuana;
C. To sell, barter, trade, exchange or otherwise furnish for consideration; or
D. To possess with the intent to do any act mentioned in paragraph C.;
G. To possess 2 grams or more of heroin or 90 or more individual bags, folds,
packages, envelopes or containers of any kind containing heroin; or
H. To possess 2 grams or more of fentanyl powder or 90 or more individual bags,
folds, packages, envelopes or containers of any kind containing fentanyl powder.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1101, sub-§18, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §2, is further
amended to read:
18. "Furnish" means:
A. To furnish, give, dispense, administer, prescribe, deliver or otherwise transfer to
another; or
B. To possess with the intent to do any act mentioned in paragraph A.;
E. To possess more than 200 milligrams but less than 2 grams of heroin or at least 45
but fewer than 90 individual bags, folds, packages, envelopes or containers of any kind
containing heroin; or
F. To possess more than 200 milligrams but less than 2 grams of fentanyl powder or
at least 45 but fewer than 90 individual bags, folds, packages, envelopes or containers
of any kind containing fentanyl powder.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §3, is
further amended to read:
B. Fourteen grams or more of cocaine or 4 grams or more of cocaine in the form of
cocaine base;
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶C-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 396, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 6. 17-A MRSA §1103, sub-§3, ¶C-2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 396, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 17-A MRSA §1105-A, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §4, is
further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1422(01)

D. At the time of the offense, the person trafficks in cocaine in a quantity of 112 grams
or more or cocaine in the form of cocaine base in a quantity of 32 grams or more.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class A crime;
Sec. 8. 17-A MRSA §1105-C, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §5, is
further amended to read:
D. At the time of the offense, the person furnishes cocaine in a quantity of 112 grams
or more or cocaine in the form of cocaine base in a quantity of 32 grams or more.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class B crime;
Sec. 9. 17-A MRSA §1106, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 396, §6, is
further amended to read:
B. More than 2 grams of cocaine or 2 grams or more of cocaine in the form of cocaine
base;
Sec. 10. 17-A MRSA §1106, sub-§3, ¶C-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 396, §6, is
repealed.
Sec. 11. 17-A MRSA §1106, sub-§3, ¶C-2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 396, §6, is
repealed.